New York, session 2025-2026, S6513.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. 1. There is hereby established a task force on the issues 2 facing black people since the end of slavery in the United States and 3 holistic solutions to ensure that black people have an equitable posi- 4 tion in education, economic development and other fields and disci- 5 plines. 6 2. (a) The task force shall be composed of nine members who shall be 7 appointed within 90 days after the effective date of this act, as 8 follows: 9 (i) three members shall be appointed by the governor; 10 (ii) two members shall be appointed by the speaker of the assembly; 11 (iii) two members shall be appointed by the temporary president of the 12 senate; 13 (iv) one member shall be appointed by the minority leader of the 14 assembly; and 15 (v) one member shall be appointed by the minority leader of the 16 senate. 17 (b) All members of the task force shall be persons who are especially 18 qualified to serve on the task force by virtue of their education, 19 training, or experience, particularly in the field of African-American 20 studies. 21 (c) The task force shall elect a chairperson from among its members. 22 (d) The members of the task force shall receive no compensation for 23 their services as members, but shall be reimbursed for their actual and 24 necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10972-01-5 S. 6513 2 1 3. (a) The task force may, for the purpose of carrying out the 2 provisions of this act, hold such hearings and sit and act at such times 3 and at such places in the United States, as the task force considers 4 appropriate. 5 (b) The task force mission may acquire directly from the head of any 6 department, agency, or instrumentality of the state, available informa- 7 tion which the task force considers useful in the discharge of its 8 duties. All departments, agencies, and instrumentalities of the state 9 shall cooperate with the task force with respect to such information and 10 shall furnish all information requested by the task force to the extent 11 permitted by law. 12 4. The task force shall submit a written report of its findings and 13 recommendations to the temporary president of the senate, the speaker of 14 the assembly, the minority leaders of the senate and the assembly and 15 the governor not later than the first of January second succeeding the 16 effective date of this act. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 18 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.